Mississippi, session 2026, SB2806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-7-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-7-89.  Any person, firm or corporation operating a truck, trailer or other carrier on any state, United States or interstate highway not properly covered as set forth in Section 63-7-83 or without sideboards as set forth in Section 63-7-85 or in violation of any of the other provisions of said Section 63-7-85 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not less than * * * twenty‑five dollars ($25.00) Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than * * * one hundred dollars ($100.00) One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each separate and distinct violation. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.